Maryland, session 2026, HB0591.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–507.1.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN WICOMICO COUNTY.
(B) IN THIS SECTION, “INHERENTLY DANGEROUS” MEANS POSING A
SERIOUS RISK OF INJURY TO A PEDESTRIAN, A DRIVER OR PASSENGER IN A VEHICLE,
OR OTHER PERSONS THAT CANNOT BE MITIGATED WITH THE EXERCISE OF
ORDINARY CARE.
(C) (1) A SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A PERSON
MAY NOT STAND IN A ROADWAY, SHOULDER, MEDIAN DIVIDER, OR INTERSECTION
DETERMINED BY THE COUNTY OR A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION IN THE COUNTY TO
BE INHERENTLY DANGEROUS.
(2) THE COUNTY OR A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION IN THE COUNTY
SHALL MAKE A DETERMINATION ON WHETHER A STATE ROADWAY, SHOULDER,
MEDIAN DIVIDER, OR INTERSECTION IS INHERENTLY DANGEROUS IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION.
– 1 –

Ch. 781 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(D) (1) A POLICE OFFICER MAY NOT ISSUE A CITATION FOR A VIOLATION
OF THIS SECTION UNLESS:
(1) (I) THE INHERENTLY DANGEROUS ROADWAY, SHOULDER,
MEDIAN DIVIDER, OR INTERSECTION HAS APPROPRIATE SIGNS INSTALLED BY THE
COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION THAT NOTIFY THE PUBLIC THAT A PERSON
MAY NOT STAND IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) (II) THE SIGNS ARE INSTALLED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
MANUAL AND SPECIFICATIONS FOR A UNIFORM SYSTEM OF TRAFFIC CONTROL
DEVICES ADOPTED BY THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION UNDER § 25–104 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
(2) ON A STATE HIGHWAY, THE COUNTY OR A MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION IN THE COUNTY MAY INSTALL THE SIGNS REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION ONLY WITH THE APPROVAL OF THE STATE
HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –